Washington, session 2025-2026, HB2335.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:PART IBUSINESS AND OCCUPATION RATE CHANGESNEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 101. The following acts or parts of acts are each repealed:(1) 2025 c 420 s 101;(2) 2025 c 420 s 102;(3) 2025 c 420 s 103;(4) 2025 c 420 s 104;(5) 2025 c 420 s 105;(6) 2025 c 420 s 106;(7) 2025 c 420 s 107;(8) 2025 c 420 s 108;(9) 2025 c 420 s 109;(10) 2025 c 420 s 110;(11) 2025 c 420 s 111;(12) 2025 c 420 s 112; and(13) 2025 c 420 s 113.PART IISURCHARGE ON HIGH GROSSING BUSINESSES AND FINANCIAL INSTITUTIONSNEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 201. The following acts or parts of acts are each repealed:(1) RCW 82.04.288 (Surcharge on Washington taxable income over $250,000,000âExemptions. (Effective January 1, 2026, until December 31, 2029.)) and 2025 c 420 s 201; and(2) 2025 c 420 s 202.PART IIIADVANCED COMPUTING SURCHARGENEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 301. 2025 c 420 s 301 is repealed.PART IVMISCELLANEOUS PROVISIONSNEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 401. RCW 82.32.805 and 82.32.808 do not apply to this act.NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 402. If any provision of this act or its application to any person or circumstance is held invalid, the remainder of the act or the application of the provision to other persons or circumstances is not affected.NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 403. This act is necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health, or safety, or support of the state government and its existing public institutions, and takes effect April 1, 2026.--- END ---